Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,124.07
Remedial action plan; participation; effect.

(1) Participating in a remedial action plan does not constitute an admission of liability under the laws of this state, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to law, or the ordinances and resolutions of any political subdivision or an admission of civil liability under statutory or common law of this state.

(2) The fact that a responsible person has participated in a remedial action plan is not admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding initiated or brought under any law of this state other than to enforce sections 81-15,124.05 to 81-15,124.07.

(3) Participating in a remedial action plan shall not be construed to be an acknowledgment that the conditions of the affected area identified and addressed by the remedial action plan constitute a threat or danger to the public health or safety or the environment.

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 15.